Utah statutes.
16-10a-808.   Removal of directors by shareholders.

(1)  The shareholders may remove one or more directors with or without cause unless the articles of incorporation provide that directors may be removed only for cause.

(2)  If a director is elected by a voting group of shareholders, only the shareholders of that voting group may participate in the vote to remove him.

(3)  If cumulative voting is in effect, a director may not be removed if the number of votes sufficient to elect the director under cumulative voting is voted against removal.  If cumulative voting is not in effect, a director may be removed only if the number of votes cast to remove the director exceeds the number of votes cast against removal.

(4)  A director may be removed by the shareholders only at a meeting called for the purpose of removing the director and the meeting notice shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of the meeting is removal of the director.

(5)  A director who is removed pursuant to this section may deliver to the division for filing a statement to that effect pursuant to Section 16-10a-1608.

